Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

The former part consisting of Code Sections 45-10-20 through 45-10-26, relating to conflicts of interest generally, was repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1 and was based on Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8.

45-10-20.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Agency” means any agency, authority, department, board, bureau, commission, committee, office, or instrumentality of the State of Georgia but shall not mean a political subdivision of the State of Georgia.

“Business” means any corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, self-employed individual, trust, or other legal entity.

“Employee” means any person who, pursuant to a written or oral contract, is employed by an agency.

“Family” means spouse and dependents.

“Full-time” means 30 hours of work for the state per week for more than 26 weeks per calendar year.

“Limited powers” means those powers other than state-wide powers.

“Part-time” means any amount of work other than full-time work.

“Person” means any person, corporation, partnership, proprietorship, firm, enterprise, franchise, association, organization, or other legal entity.

“Public official” means any person elected to a state office and means any person appointed to a state office where in the conduct of such office the person so appointed has administrative and discretionary authority to receive and expend public funds and to perform certain functions concerning the public which are assigned to him or her by law.

“State-wide powers” means those powers exercised by public officials which affect and influence all of state government. Public officials who exercise such powers include but are not limited to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, members of the General Assembly, Justices of the Supreme Court, Judges of the Court of Appeals, the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, the state auditor, the state accounting officer, the commissioner of administrative services, members of the State Personnel Board, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, judges of the superior courts, and district attorneys.

“Substantial interest” means the direct or indirect ownership of more than 25 percent of the assets or stock of any business.

“Transact business” or “transact any business” means to sell or lease any personal property, real property, or services on behalf of oneself or on behalf of any third party as an agent, broker, dealer, or representative and means to purchase surplus real or personal property on behalf of oneself or on behalf of any third party as an agent, broker, dealer, or representative.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1337, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 36/HB 293; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-71/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “administrative services” was substituted for “the Department of Administrative Services” in paragraph (10).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-21.
Legislative purposes and intent.

It is essential to the proper operation of democratic government that public officials be independent and impartial, that governmental decisions and policy be made in the proper channels of the governmental structure, that public office not be used for private gain other than the remuneration provided by law, and that there be public confidence in the integrity of government. The attainment of one or more of these ends is impaired whenever there exists a conflict between the private interests of an elected official or a government employee and his duties as such. The public interest, therefore, requires that the law protect against such conflicts of interest and establish appropriate ethical standards with respect to the conduct of elected officials and government employees in situations where conflicts exist.

It is also essential to the proper operation of government that those best qualified be encouraged to serve the government. Accordingly, legal safeguards against conflicts of interest must be so designed as not unnecessarily or unreasonably to impede the recruitment and retention by the government of those men and women who are best qualified to serve it. An essential principle underlying the staffing of our government structure is that its elected officials and employees should not be denied the opportunity, available to all other citizens, to acquire and retain private economic and other interests, except where conflicts with the responsibility of such elected officials and employees to the public cannot be avoided.

The General Assembly declares that the operation of responsible democratic government requires that the fullest opportunity be afforded to the people to petition their government for the redress of grievances and to express freely to individual members of the General Assembly, to committees of the General Assembly, and to officials of the executive branch their opinions on legislation, on pending executive actions, and on current issues and that, to preserve and maintain the integrity of the legislative and administrative processes, it is necessary that the identity, expenditures, and activities of certain persons who engage in efforts to persuade members of the General Assembly or the executive branch to take specific actions, either by direct communication to such officials, or by solicitation of others to engage in such efforts, be publicly and regularly disclosed. The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed to promote complete disclosure of such information so as to assure that the public interest will be fully protected.

It is the policy and purpose of this article to implement these objectives of protecting the integrity of all governmental units of this state and of facilitating the recruitment and retention of qualified personnel by prescribing essential restrictions against conflicts of interest in state government without creating unnecessary barriers to the public service.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-22.
Full-time public officials with state-wide powers prohibitions; public officials or employees with limited powers prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful for any full-time public official who has state-wide powers, for himself or on behalf of any business, or for any business in which such public official or member of his family has a substantial interest to transact any business with any agency.

It shall be unlawful for any public official who has limited powers, for himself or on behalf of any business, or for any business in which such public official or member of his family has a substantial interest to transact any business with the agency for which such public official serves.

The provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Any transaction made pursuant to sealed competitive bids;

Any transaction when the amount of a single transaction does not exceed $250.00 and when the aggregate of all such transactions does not exceed $9,000.00 per calendar year; and

Any transaction involving the lease of real property to or from any agency if such transaction has been approved by the State Properties Commission or the Space Management Division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Code Section 45-10-28.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1337, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-23.
Full-time employees prohibited from transacting business with own state agency; exception for Board of Regents employees.

It shall be unlawful for any full-time employee, for himself or on behalf of any business, or for any business in which such employee or member of his family has a substantial interest to transact any business with the agency by which such employee is employed; provided, however, that neither this Code section nor any other provision of law shall prevent full-time employees of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia from serving as members of the governing boards of private, nonprofit, educational, athletic, or research related foundations and associations which are organized for the purpose of supporting institutions of higher education in this state and which in furtherance of this purpose may transact business with such institutions or with the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Code Section 45-10-28.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 882, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-24.
Part-time public officials with state-wide powers prohibitions; part-time employees prohibitions; exceptions to prohibitions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall be unlawful for any part-time public official who has state-wide powers, for himself or on behalf of any business, or for any business in which such public official or member of his family has a substantial interest to transact any business with any agency.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, it shall be unlawful for any part-time employee, for himself or on behalf of any business, or for any business in which such employee or member of his family has a substantial interest to transact any business with the agency by which such employee is employed.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:

Any transaction made pursuant to sealed competitive bids;

Any transaction when the amount of a single transaction does not exceed $250.00 and when the aggregate of all such transactions does not exceed $9,000.00 per calendar year;

Any transaction involving the lease of real property to or from any agency if such transaction has been approved by the State Properties Commission or the Space Management Division of the Department of Administrative Services; and

Any transaction involving the purchase of surplus state property at a public auction.

Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Code Section 45-10-28.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 452, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1987, “of this Code section” was inserted in the introductory language of subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-24.1.
Exemption for transactions by family owned business when university system employee has interest; requirements.

Subsection (a) of Code Section 45-10-23 and paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-10-24 shall not apply to a transaction with a unit of the University System of Georgia by a family owned business in which an employee of the university system or a member of the employee’s family has an ownership interest where all of the following apply:

The employee or one or more members of the employee’s family or both have an ownership interest in a family owned business, but the employee is not actively engaged in the day-to-day management of the business;

The employee is employed by a department of the unit of the university system in a position below that of department head; and

The transaction is:

With a unit of the university system different than the unit employing the employee; or

With a department of the employing unit of the university system different than the department employing the employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 516, § 1.

45-10-25.
Exceptions to prohibitions on transactions with state agencies.

The provisions of Code Sections 45-10-22, 45-10-23, and 45-10-24 shall not apply to:

Any transaction involving the sale of real property to the state or any agency through eminent domain;

Any transaction involving the purchase by the public official or employee of any health or life insurance, disability benefits, or retirement or pension benefits offered as a part of a public official’s or employee’s service or employment;

Any transaction between a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest and any person, the cost of which transaction is paid directly or indirectly by state funds, if the property or services involved in the transaction are for the private use and benefit of the person to whom such property or services are sold or rendered and such person does not subsequently sell or lease such property or services to an agency;

Any transaction between a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest and the state or any agency thereof under which it is agreed that the public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest is to provide Medicaid and related services and benefits or medicare and related services and benefits, or both, and under which it is agreed that the state or any agency thereof is to reimburse or pay for the services and benefits so provided;

Any transaction between a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest and the state or any agency thereof under which the public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest directly or indirectly receives reimbursement or payment from the state or any agency thereof for providing Medicaid and related services and benefits or medicare and related services and benefits, or both, and under which the state or any agency thereof reimburses or pays the public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest for providing Medicaid and related services and benefits or medicare and related services and benefits, or both;

Any transaction between a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest and any state contractor if there was no agreement prior to the transaction that the public official or employee would assist, other than by providing goods or services as required under the terms of the agreement underlying the transaction, the contractor in obtaining, retaining, or fulfilling the state contract and if the public official or employee does not assist, other than by providing goods or services as required under the terms of the agreement underlying the transaction, the contractor in obtaining, retaining, or fulfilling the state contract;

Any transaction involving part-time employment by the Georgia Building Authority or the Department of Natural Resources of custodial and cleaning workers or cooks who work for other agencies;

Any transaction involving part-time employment by any agency of a chaplain; firefighter; any person holding a doctoral or master’s degree from an accredited college or university; a licensed physician, dentist, or psychologist; a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; or a certified oral or manual interpreter for deaf persons, if employed by the state, if:

The chief executive officer of the department, agency, commission, or authority which desires to obtain the services of a chaplain; firefighter; any person holding a doctoral or master’s degree from an accredited college or university; a licensed physician, dentist, or psychologist; a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; or a certified oral or manual interpreter for deaf persons presently employed by another department, agency, commission, or authority of the state shall certify in writing the need for the services and set forth why the best interest of the state will be served by obtaining the part-time services of such a person in lieu of obtaining such services from a person not presently employed by the state;

The chief executive officer of the department, agency, commission, or authority presently employing the chaplain; firefighter; any person holding a doctoral or master’s degree from an accredited college or university; the licensed physician, dentist, or psychologist; the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse; or the certified oral or manual interpreter for deaf persons shall certify in writing that the person whose services are desired is available to perform such services, that the performance of such services will not detract or have a detrimental effect on the performance of said person’s employment and, where appropriate, that the part-time employment of such person by the department, agency, commission, or authority desirous of obtaining the services will be in the best interest of the state; and

The departments, agencies, commissions, or authorities, after having complied with subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph shall, by agreement, establish the procedures under which the employee shall perform the additional services. The agreement shall specify the means of employment either as a part-time employee or as a consultant, the compensation, and other pertinent details and conditions of the employment relationship. The agreement shall be terminable at any time by either of the departments, agencies, commissions, or authorities;

Any transaction involving the Public Service Commission’s employment of any state employee who has any particular expertise or knowledge which may be of assistance to the Georgia Public Service Commission in fulfilling its duties and responsibilities under Title 46. The terms and conditions of such employment shall be solely determined by the Georgia Public Service Commission; but, in any event, the employee may not provide services to the Georgia Public Service Commission during such times as he or she is regularly scheduled to be at his or her primary place of employment unless the employee has received permission to do so from his or her regular employer or unless the employee is on annual leave or leave without pay;

Any transaction involving an emergency purchase by any agency which must be made to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens or property of Georgia;

Any transaction involving property or a service for which the only source of supply in the State of Georgia is from the public official or employee or a business in which such public official or employee or member of his family has a substantial interest;

Any transaction occurring prior to March 1, 1983;

Any transaction occurring prior to qualifying to run for elective office, accepting appointment to public office, or accepting public employment and any transaction occurring after qualifying to run for elective office, accepting appointment to public office, or accepting public employment if the legal obligation and duty to undertake such transaction arose prior to qualifying to run for elective office, accepting appointment to public office, or accepting public employment;

Any transaction whereby a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest collects a fee or commission as compensation for performing a service for the state when such performance is required or authorized by law, including but not limited to the collection of state sales tax, the collection of license fees, and the collection of excise taxes;

Any transaction whereby an appointed public official or employee, under the procedures specified in this paragraph, sells to a unit of the University System of Georgia services as a teacher or instructor of an evening or night course or program, if:

The chief executive officer of the unit of the University System of Georgia shall certify in writing the need for the services and set forth why the best interest of the state will be served by obtaining the services of such state official or employee in lieu of obtaining such services from a person not presently employed by the state;

The chief executive officer of the department, agency, commission, or authority presently employing the state official or employee shall certify in writing that the person whose services are desired is available to perform such services, that the performance of such services will not detract or have a detrimental effect on the performance of said person’s full-time employment, and, where appropriate, that the employment of such person by the unit of the University System of Georgia will be in the best interest of the state; and

The departments, agencies, commissions, authorities, and units, after having complied with subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, shall, by agreement, establish the procedures under which the official or employee shall perform the additional services. The agreement shall specify the means of employment, the compensation, and other pertinent details and conditions of the employment relationship. The agreement shall be terminable at any time by any of the departments, agencies, commissions, authorities, or units; or

Any transaction involving the lease for the purpose of small business and economic development of laboratory and research facilities owned by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia during times when the laboratory and research facilities are not in use.

Authority is given for a public official or employee or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his family has a substantial interest and the state or any agency thereof to engage in any transaction exempted from the coverage of this part by subsection (a) of this Code section and subsection (b) of Code Section 45-10-24 and any transaction necessary and proper to such transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1204, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 45; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1034, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 45; Ga. L. 1987, p. 848, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 308, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 167, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4(24); Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11(24); Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 34/SB 148; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “or the consumers’ utility counsel division of the office of the administrator created in Code Section 10-1-395” following “assistance to the Georgia Public Service Commission” in paragraph (a)(9).

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subparagraph (a)(8)(A).

Cross references.

Creation of authorities for financing residential care facilities for the elderly, §

31-7-110

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-26.
Annual disclosure statements concerning business transactions with state; public records.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, any public official or employee, whether for himself, herself, or on behalf of any business, or any business in which such public official or employee or any member of his or her family has a substantial interest who transacts business with the state or any agency thereof shall disclose such transactions. Such disclosure shall be submitted prior to January 31 each year to the Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission on such forms as it shall prescribe and shall include an itemized list of the previous year’s transactions with the dollar amount of each transaction reported and totaled. Such disclosure statements shall be public records.

The requirement to disclose certain transactions as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any transaction when the amount of a single transaction does not exceed $250.00 and when the aggregate of all transactions does not exceed $9,000.00 per calendar year.

Any person who fails to file a disclosure statement as required in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Code Section 45-10-28.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-26

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1196, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 28/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

45-10-27.
Construction of part with provisions, rules, and regulations of Chapter 20 of this title.

This part shall in no way supersede any provision of Chapter 20 of this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-72/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-10-28.
Penalties for violation of part; civil actions by Attorney General to collect penalties; violations by public official, agency head, or employee.

Any appointed public official or employee who violates Code Section 45-10-22, 45-10-23, 45-10-24, 45-10-26, or 45-10-29 shall be subject to:

Removal from office or employment;

A civil fine not to exceed $10,000.00; and

Restitution to the state of any pecuniary benefit received as a result of such violation.

Any elected public official who violates Code Section 45-10-22, 45-10-23, 45-10-24, 45-10-26, or 45-10-29 shall be subject to:

A civil fine not to exceed $10,000.00; and

Restitution to the state of any pecuniary benefit received as a result of such violation.

Any business which violates Code Section 45-10-22, 45-10-23, 45-10-24, 45-10-26, or 45-10-29 shall be subject to:

A civil fine not to exceed $10,000.00; and

Restitution to the state of any pecuniary benefit received as a result of such violation.

The penalties provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section may be imposed in any civil action brought for that purpose, and such actions shall be brought by the Attorney General.

As used in this subsection, the term “agency head” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 50-36-1. Any public official, agency head, or employee who violates Code Section 13-10-91 or 50-36-1 shall be subject to:

A civil fine not to exceed $10,000.00;

Restitution to the state or local government, whichever is applicable, of any pecuniary benefit received as a result of such violation; and

Where such violation is committed knowingly and intentionally, removal from office or employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-28

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1326, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 449, § 10/HB 413; Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 15/HB 87; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 45/HB 942.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 1/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 21/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability, and provides in part, that: “(b)
The terms of this Act regarding immigration shall be construed to have the meanings consistent with such terms under federal immigration law.

“(c)
The provisions of this Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal laws governing immigration and civil rights.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 794, § 22/HB 87, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section by that Act shall apply to offenses and violations occurring on or after July 1, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article, “State Government:
Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 51 (2011).

45-10-29.
Public officials prohibited from granting themselves licenses by waiving certain requirements; requirements to be satisfied prior to renewal of licenses; penalties for violations.

Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a public official shall not be authorized to waive any legal, educational, or testing requirement for himself or herself relative to the issuance of any license to himself, herself, or to his or her business.

Any license that has been issued by a public official by waiving any legal, educational, or testing requirement for himself or herself relative to the issuance of any license to himself, herself, or to his or her business shall not be renewed until and unless the license holder has satisfied all of the requirements for securing a renewal license as well as any requirement that had been waived for the issuance of the original license.

Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be subject to the penalties provided for in Code Section 45-10-28.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-29

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 449, § 11/HB 413.